Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
My Old Kentucky Home State Park

148.400.
My Old Kentucky Home Endowment Fund.

There is established in the State Treasury “My Old Kentucky Home Endowment Fund” which shall be administered by the park superintendent at My Old Kentucky Home State Park under the supervision of the commissioner of the Department of Parks.The fund may receive state appropriations, federal funds, and private donations. The fund shall be used for maintenance, furnishings, and repairs of My Old Kentucky Home House Museum and maintenance of the grounds of My Old Kentucky Home State Park.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 189, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 176, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; 2017 ch. 80, § 5, effective June 29, 2017.

148.510.
Establishment of department; commissioner; organization. [Repealed.]

148.520.
Establishment of Parks Board; membership. [Repealed.]